Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4101
Act, how cited.

Sections
29-4101 to 29-4115.01 shall be known
and may be cited as the DNA Identification Information Act.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 385, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 28;

Laws 2010, LB190, § 2.